Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.090

Campaign goals.

The commission shall adopt as major objectives of its research, promotional, and educational campaign goals that serve the needs of producers. The goals may include efforts to:

(1) Establish Washington beer as a major factor in markets everywhere;

(2) Promote Washington breweries as tourist attractions;

(3) Encourage favorable reporting of Washington beer and breweries in the press throughout the world;

(4) Establish Washington beer in markets everywhere as a major source of premium beer;

(5) Encourage favorable legislative and regulatory treatment of Washington beer in markets everywhere;

(6) Encourage promotion of Washington agriculture related to beer production, specifically hops, malting barley, and wheat grown in the state; and

(7) Foster economic conditions favorable to investment in the production of Washington beer.

[ 2006 c 330 s 12.]